Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.531

Standard set of criteria—Updated versions—Review and use.

When updated versions of the ASAM Criteria, treatment criteria for addictive, substance related, and co-occurring conditions, inclusive of adolescent and transition age youth versions, are published by the American society of addiction medicine, the health care authority and the office of the insurance commissioner shall jointly determine whether to use the updated version, and, if so, the date upon which the updated version must begin to be used by medicaid managed care organizations, carriers, and other relevant entities. Both agencies shall post notice of their decision on their websites. For purposes of the ASAM Criteria, 4th edition, medicaid managed care organizations and carriers shall begin to use the updated criteria no later than January 1, 2026, unless the health care authority and the office of the insurance commissioner jointly determine that it should not be used.

[ 2024 c 366 s 10.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2024 c 366: See note following RCW 71.24.847.